Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1205
Judgeships; annual hearing; recommendations.

By December 15, 1995, and each year thereafter, the Judicial Resources
Commission shall hold a hearing to determine whether (1) a new judgeship is
appropriate in any judicial district or a reduction in judgeships is appropriate
in any judicial district or (2) the judicial district boundaries or the number
of judicial districts should be changed for the district or county courts.
The commission shall also examine current caseload statistics and make any
appropriate recommendations for the more balanced use of existing judicial
resources. The State Court Administrator shall provide adequate administrative
support and information as requested by the commission. A report of this hearing
and any recommendations shall be filed by the commission with the Legislature,
the Governor, and the Supreme Court on or before December 31 of each year. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1995, LB 189, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 26.